Illinois, session 104th, HB1020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 9-247 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/9-247 new)7    Sec. 9-247. Rates and charges; finding; expected job 8losses. The Commission, in any determination of rates or 9charges that differs from any rates or charges proposed by the 10utility, shall make a separate finding of the expected job 11losses, if any, that would occur due to the Commission's 12finding.